Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-336
State wildlife management areas; commission; powers; fees; disposition of proceeds; violation; penalty.

(1) State wildlife management areas shall be administered by the commission but not as a part of the state park system nor with park funds.

(2) The commission may establish and collect reasonable fees for the use of operated facilities of a personal-service nature in state wildlife management areas, may in its sole discretion grant concessions in such areas for the provision of appropriate services to the public, may grant permits for certain land or other resource utilization commensurate with the purposes of this section, and may prescribe and collect appropriate fees or rentals therefor. The proceeds of all such fees, rentals, and other revenue from operated facilities, concessions, or permits shall be deposited in the State Game Fund.

(3) Any person violating this section or the regulations governing the public use or administration of a state wildlife management area shall be guilty of a Class III misdemeanor.

(4) For purposes of this section, state wildlife management areas means those areas which are primarily of public hunting, fishing, or other wildlife values, and which cannot logically be classified in one of the categories listed in subdivision (1), (2), or (3) of section 37-338, when so designated by the commission to be maintained from fish and game funds.

Laws 1959, c. 436, § 12, p. 1467;

Laws 1978, LB 613, § 4;

R.S.1943, (1996), § 81-815.32;

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 94.